Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1109
Director of Administrative Services; technical assistance to Governor; reports to Governor.

The Director of Administrative Services shall be responsible to the Governor for provision of technical assistance, advice, and information concerning the financial and administrative operations of all agencies of the state, for provision of technical assistance and advice on the preparation of the Governor's budget, otherwise referred to in sections 81-1101 to 81-1117.05 as the executive budget, and for administration of the approved budget within the limits of appropriations provided except as otherwise provided by law. He or she shall be responsible to the Governor for the provision of current reports of the financial condition of the state and each of its departments and agencies and for the provision of timely recommendations for dealing with financial, management, and organizational problems affecting the administration of the business of the state and its departments and agencies.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 9, p. 1696;

Laws 1995, LB 15, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 45.
July 19, 2024